District of Columbia statutes.
28-4032

Implied warranty; responsibility for repair; return or replacement; certain actions deemed void.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or express warranty furnished by the manufacturer, the manufacturer shall be deemed to have warranted that for a period of one year from date of 1st delivery to the consumer the assistive technology device, when used as intended, will be free from any nonconformity. Any nonconformity shall be repaired, including parts and labor, by the manufacturer or its agent without cost to the consumer.

(b)

If, after a reasonable attempt to repair, the nonconformity is not repaired, the assistive device dealer, assistive device lessor, or manufacturer shall, within 30 days after a consumer’s request:

(1)

Refund to the consumer all collateral costs; and

(2)

(A)

Accept return of the nonconforming assistive technology device and replace the nonconforming assistive technology device with one of comparable value, function, and usefulness; or

(B)

Refund the full purchase price to the consumer.

(c)

A manufacturer or dealer exclusion or limitation of the implied warranties or consumer remedies prescribed by this section shall be void.

(d)

A purported waiver of rights to legal action by a consumer within an assistive technology device purchase agreement or assistive technology device lease agreement shall be void.

History

Oct. 26, 2010, D.C. Law 18-241, § 3, 57 DCR 7550
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 83(d), 59 DCR 6190

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to D.C. Law 18-241 which did not affect this section as codified.